Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 21.3 The Rhode Island Student Assistance Junior High/Middle School Act

16-21.3-1.
Declaration of purpose.

In recognition of the growing problem of substance use and abuse among youth and that the average age of onset of substance use and abuse is middle school age, the purpose of this chapter is as follows:

To establish a student assistance program in every public junior high/middle school based upon the model currently operating successfully in Rhode Island high schools.

The student assistance program will address the following areas:

Identification and supportive services for high risk youth;

Primary prevention programming in junior high/middle schools;

Assessment and referral services for substance abuse problems;

School staff training on integration of prevention/intervention program;

Parent and community programming for substance abuse prevention;

Focused prevention/support groups for high risk youth;

Development and integration of school substance abuse policy with prevention/intervention services;

To promote integration between student assistance programs and community substance abuse prevention task forces.

To establish a pilot student assistance program in public elementary schools to the extent that funds are available from the junior high/middle school student assistance fund for that purpose.

To establish a student assistance program in every public high school to the extent that funds are available.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 486, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 57, § 1.

16-21.3-2.
Junior high/middle school student assistance program.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall be charged with the administration of this chapter and shall contract with appropriate substance abuse prevention/intervention agencies to provide student assistance services in junior high/middle schools.

Following the first complete year of operation, school systems receiving junior high/middle school student assistance services will be required to contribute twenty percent (20%) of the costs of student assistance counselors to the service provider agency in order to continue the services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 486, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 9; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 36.

16-21.3-3.
Funding of junior high/middle school student assistance program.

Money to fund this program shall be raised by assessing an additional substance abuse prevention assessment of thirty dollars ($30.00) for all moving motor vehicle violations handled by the traffic tribunal including, but not limited to, those violations set forth in §

31-41.1-4

, except for speeding. The money shall be deposited in a restricted purpose receipt account separate from all other accounts within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals. The restricted purpose receipt account shall be known as the junior high/middle school student assistance fund and the traffic tribunal shall transfer money from the junior high/middle school student assistance fund to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals for the administration of the Rhode Island Student Assistance Junior High/Middle School Act.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals may utilize up to ten percent (10%) of the sums collected from the additional penalty for the purpose of administering the program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 486, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 57, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 488, § 6; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 26, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 35, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 9; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 39; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 36.

16-21.3-4.
The duties of the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

The director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals or his or her designated agent shall make an annual report by September 1 of each year to the governor and general assembly on the administration of the program and shall submit to the governor and the general assembly the results of an independent evaluation of the substance abuse prevention program created in accordance with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 486, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 9; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 39; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 36.

16-21.3-5.
Permanent legislative oversight commission on substance abuse prevention.

The established permanent legislative oversight commission on substance abuse prevention shall oversee the implementation and administration of this chapter and shall advise and make recommendations to the general assembly as to the adequacy and efficiency of all statutes, rules, regulations, guidelines, practices, and programs relating to substance abuse prevention. Members of the commission shall serve without compensation, except that they shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties under this section. The commission may request and shall receive from any instrumentality of the state, including the division of substance abuse services of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, and from any municipality or any instrumentality of the municipality, any information and assistance it deems necessary for the proper execution of its powers and duties under this section. The commission shall meet at least quarterly and shall report at least annually to the general assembly on its findings and recommendations with respect to: (a) all existing substance abuse prevention programs; (b) all rules, regulations, and guidelines promulgated pursuant to this chapter; (c) administration of this chapter; (d) any other matters relating to substance abuse prevention efforts in the state. The legislative oversight commission shall have the authority to designate or commit after careful evaluation unexpended funds from this chapter and chapter 21.2 of this title to appropriate substance abuse prevention programming and/or planning.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 486, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 9; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 36.